Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 105
BANKING PRACTICES

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2003. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 ELECTRONIC FUNDS TRANSFERS

PART 3 RESERVES, LOANS, AND INVESTMENTS

PART 4 PROPERTY, SALES, BORROWING, AND SIGNATURE GUARANTY

PART 5 SAFE DEPOSIT AND SAFEKEEPING FACILITIES

PART 6 FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS, OPERATION OF BRANCHES, ORGANIZATIONAL AND OPERATIONAL EQUALITY